Utah statutes.
53B-2-109.   Notice to local government when constructing student housing.
(1)  Each institution that intends to construct student housing on property
owned by the institution shall provide written notice of the intended
construction, as provided in Subsection (2), before any funds are committed to
the construction, if any of the proposed student housing buildings is within
300 feet of privately owned residential property.
(2)  Each notice under Subsection (1) shall be provided to the legislative
body and, if applicable, the mayor of:
(a)  the county in whose unincorporated area the privately owned residential
property is located; or
(b)  the municipality in whose boundaries the privately owned residential
property is located.
(3) (a) (i)  Within 21 days after receiving the notice required by Subsection
(1), a county or municipality entitled to the notice may submit a written
request to the institution for a public hearing on the proposed student
housing construction.
(ii)  Each county or municipality that submits a written request for a hearing
under Subsection (3)(a) shall deliver a copy of the request to the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management.
(b)  If a county or municipality requests a hearing under Subsection (3)(a),
the legislative body of the affected county or municipality and the
institution shall jointly hold a public hearing to provide information to the
public and to allow the institution and the county or municipality to receive
input from the public about the proposed student housing construction.
(c)  A public hearing held under Subsection (3)(a) satisfies the public
hearing requirement of Subsection 63A-5-206(13)(b) for the same proposed
student housing construction.
